Utah, session 2026, HB23.
Section 1. Section 13-1a-6 is amended to read:13-1a-6. Powers and responsibilities of Division of Corporations and Commercial Code -- Document retention.(1)The Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall have the power and authority reasonably necessary to enable it to efficiently administer the laws and rules for which it is responsible and to perform the duties imposed upon it by law.(2)The division has authority under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to make rules and procedures for the processing, retention, and disposal of filed documents to efficiently utilize electronic and computerized document image storage and retrieval.(3)Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 63A-12-105, original documents filed in the division offices may not be considered property of the state if electronic image reproductions thereof which comply with the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, are retained by the division.(4)The division shall publish on a website accessible to the public the contact information and internet website link of the protection and advocacy agency designated by the governor that can assist members of the public in understanding the current laws and regulations regarding service animals and public accommodation.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.